California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay the surcharge is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the
 person liable for the surcharge.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on surcharge liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

40104.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the surcharge imposed by this part and any penalty or interest added thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to surcharge under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to the surcharge, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to the surcharge.

(3) The liability for surcharges applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of the rescinded or modified advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the board may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the board’s
 written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 987, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

40105.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A surcharge liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of surcharge
 liability is attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the surcharge reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported surcharge liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in surcharge attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of
 liability for the surcharge (including interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of the surcharge.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar quarters subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar quarter that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know” means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as an electric utility making sales of electrical energy or as a consumer of electrical energy to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as an electric utility or a consumer, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if,
 taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid surcharge or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Overpayments and Refunds [40111. - 40137.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [40111. - 40117.]

40111.

(a) If the department determines that any amount, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once or has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the department shall set forth that fact in the records of the department, certify the amount collected in excess of the amount legally due and the person from whom it was collected or by whom paid, and shall credit the excess amount collected or paid on any amounts then due and payable from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall be refunded to the person, or the person’s successors, administrators, or executors. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be
 available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(b) Any overpayment of the surcharge by a consumer to the state shall be credited or refunded by the state to the consumer.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any overpayment of the surcharge by the consumer to an electric utility that is required to collect the surcharge shall be refunded by the state to the consumer.

(2) If the electric utility has paid the amount to the department and establishes to the satisfaction of the department that it has not collected the amount from the consumer or has refunded the amount to the consumer, the overpayment may be credited or refunded by the state to the electric utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 53.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40112.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no refund shall be approved by the board after three years from the last day of the month following the close of the quarterly period for which the overpayment was made, or, with respect to determinations made under Article 3 (commencing with Section 40071) or 4 (commencing with Section 40081) of Chapter 4 of this part, after six months from the date the determinations become final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires the later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the board within such period. No credit shall be approved by the board after the expiration of such
 period unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within such period.

(b) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver is given under Section 40079 if a claim therefor is filed with the board before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

40112.1.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 40112 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last
 for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

40112.2.

Notwithstanding Section 40112, a refund of an overpayment of any surcharge, penalty, or interest collected by the board by means of levy, through the use of liens, or by other enforcement procedures, shall be approved if a claim for a refund is filed within three years of the date of an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

40112.3.

(a) A claim for refund that is otherwise valid under Sections 40112 and 40113 that is made in the case in which the amount of surcharge determined has not been paid in full shall be deemed to be a timely filed claim for refund with respect to all subsequent payments applied to that determination.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount of surcharge determined” means an amount of surcharge,
 interest, or penalty, with respect to a single determination made under Article 3 (commencing with Section 40071) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 40081) of Chapter 4.

(c) This section shall apply to all claims for refund on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 98, Sec. 5.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

40113.

Every claim shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the claim is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40114.

Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this article constitutes a waiver of any demand against the state on account of overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40115.

Within 30 days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part the board shall give notice of its action to the claimant in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40116.

Interest at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, shall be paid upon any overpayment of any amount of surcharge from the first day of the calendar month following the month during which the overpayment was made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the person making the overpayment with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In the case of a refund, to the last day of the calendar month following the date upon which the person making the overpayment, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is the earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the surcharge or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

40117.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cancellations [40121. - 40121.]

40121.

If any amount has been illegally determined either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall set forth that fact in its records, certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 54.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Suit for Refund [40125. - 40131.]

40125.

No injunction, or writ of mandate, judgment of declaratory relief, or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against the state or against any officer of the state to prevent or enjoin the collection under this part of any surcharge, or any amount of surcharge required to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40126.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally determined or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40127.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 40111) of this chapter, the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in any city or city and county of this state in which the Attorney General has an office for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40128.

If the board fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board of its action on the claim, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40129.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any surcharge due and payable from the plaintiff. The balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40130.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 49.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

40131.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the person paying the amount or by any person other than the person who paid the amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [40135. - 40137.]

40135.

(a) The board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering any
 erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 40071) of Chapter 4. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

40136.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40135, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

40137.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40135, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Collection of Surcharge [40141. - 40169.]



  ARTICLE 1. Suit for Surcharge [40141. - 40145.]

40141.

At any time within 10 years after any surcharge or any amount of surcharge required to be collected becomes due and payable, and at any time after any amount determined under Articles 3 (commencing with Section 40071), 4 (commencing with Section 40081), and 5 (commencing with Section 40091) of Chapter 4 of this part becomes due and payable, the board may bring an action in the courts of this state, of any other state, or of the United States in the name of the people of California to collect the amount delinquent together with penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40142.

The Attorney General shall prosecute the action, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals are applicable to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40143.

In the action a writ of attachment may issue, and no bond or affidavit previous to the issuing of the attachment is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40144.

In the action a certificate by the board showing the delinquency shall be prima facie evidence of the determination of the surcharge or the amount of surcharge, of the delinquency of the amounts set forth, and of the compliance by the board with all the provisions of this part in relation to the computation and determination of the amounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40145.

In any action brought under this part process may be served according to the Code of Civil Procedure and the Civil Code of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Notice to Withhold [40151. - 40156.]

40151.

If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid by him or in the event a determination has been made against him which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than five years after the payment became delinquent, give notice thereof personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the delinquent, or person against whom a determination has been made which remains unpaid, or owing any debts to the delinquent or such person. In the case of any
 state officer, department or agency, the notice shall be given to such officer, department or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent to the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 827.)
-------------------------------------------

40152.

After receiving the notice the person so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires the earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40153.

All persons so notified shall forthwith after receipt of the notice advise the board of all such credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If such notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice to be effective shall state the amount, interest and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of such bank at which such deposit is carried or at which such credits or personal property is held. Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to
 a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of two times the amount, interest and penalty due from the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40154.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld hereunder, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid he shall be liable to the state for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason of such transfer or disposition the state is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40155.

(a) The department may, by notice of levy, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a consumer or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from these credits or other personal property the amount of any surcharge, interest, or penalties due from the consumer or other person, or the amount of any liability incurred by them under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the department at the time it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution except for the continuing effect of the levy, as
 provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:

(1) Payments due for services of independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the consumer or other
 person liable for the surcharge.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the consumer or other person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the consumer and shall be delivered, mailed, or served by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 55.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40156.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the board determines upon receiving information from a user or other person liable for any amount under this part that the person’s employer withheld earnings for taxes pursuant to Section 40155 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the board, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The board’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or other substantiating evidence
 furnished by the person liable for the tax.

(b) Upon its determination, the board shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the board within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the board upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be determined, collected, and paid as though it were a tax deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld.

(d) When the
 determination against the employer is final and due and payable, the person’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that determined amount as though it were a payment received by the board on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the person liable for the tax is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the board under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the person’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the determination against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the person is notified by the board thereof.

(f) If under this section an amount that was
 withheld and not remitted to the board is final and due and payable by the employer and credited to the person’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the person to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall apply to determinations made by the board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Priority and Lien of Surcharge [40157. - 40158.]

40157.

The amounts required to be paid by any person under this part together with interest and penalties shall be satisfied first in any of the following cases:

(a) Whenever the person is insolvent.

(b) Whenever the person makes a voluntary assignment of his or her assets.

(c) Whenever the estate of the person in the hands of executors, administrators, or heirs is insufficient to pay all the debts due from the deceased.

(d) Whenever the estate and effects of an absconding, concealed, or absent person required to pay any amount under this part are levied upon by process of law.

This section does not give the state a preference over any lien or security interest which was recorded or perfected prior to the time when the state records or files its lien as provided in Section 7171 of the Government Code.

The preference given to the state by this section shall be subordinate to the preferences given to claims for personal services by Sections 1204 and 1206 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1589, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

40158.

(a) If any person fails to pay any amount imposed under this part at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. Such a lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. 

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts disclosed
 on a return received by the board before the date the return is delinquent, the date the return would have been delinquent.

(2) For amounts disclosed on a return filed on or after the date the return is delinquent, the date the return is received by the board.

(3) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1589, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Warrant for Collection [40161. - 40163.]

40161.

At any time within five years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount required to be paid under this part the board or its authorized representative may issue a warrant for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 159.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

40162.

The board shall pay the sheriff or marshal, upon the completion of his or her services pursuant to a warrant, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for his or her services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The board, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 160.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

40163.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the surcharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Miscellaneous [40166. - 40169.]

40166.

The board shall not be subject to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16307 of the Corporations Code unless, at the time of application for or issuance of a permit, license, or registration number under this part, the applicant furnishes to the board a written partnership agreement that provides that all business assets shall be held in the name of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

40167.

(a) The board may, in its discretion, enter into a written installment payment agreement with a person for the payment of any surcharges due, together with interest thereon and any applicable penalties, in installments over an agreed period. With mutual consent, the board and the person liable for the surcharge may alter or modify the agreement.

(b) Upon failure of a person to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement with the board, the board may
 terminate the agreement by mailing a notice of termination to the person. The notice shall include an explanation of the basis for the termination and inform the person of his or her right to request an administrative review of the termination. Fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the installment payment agreement shall be void, and the total amount of the surcharge, interest, and penalties due shall be immediately payable.

(c) The board shall establish procedures for an administrative review for persons requesting that review whose installment payment agreements are terminated under subdivision (b). The collection of surcharge, interest, and penalties that are the subject of the terminated installment payment agreement may not be stayed during this administrative review process. 

(d) Except in the case of fraud, if an installment payment agreement is entered into within
 45 days from the date on which the board’s notice of determination or redetermination becomes final and the person complies with the terms of the installment payment agreement, the board shall relieve the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 40096.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

40167.5.

The board shall, beginning no later than January 1, 2001, provide each taxpayer who has an installment payment agreement in effect under Section 40167 an annual statement setting forth the initial balance at the beginning of the year, the payments made during the year, and the remaining balance as of the end of the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

40168.

(a) A collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed on any person that fails to pay an amount of surcharge, interest, penalty, or other amount due and payable under this part. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in an amount less than or equal to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration’s costs for collection, as reasonably determined by the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. The collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed only if the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has mailed its demand notice, to that person for payment, that advises that continued failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee.

(b) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(c) The collection cost recovery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected in the same manner as the collection of any other surcharge imposed by this
 part.

(d) (1) If the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration finds that a person’s failure to pay any amount under this part is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(2) Any person seeking to be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee shall file with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(e) Subdivision (a)
 shall be operative with respect to a demand notice for payment which is mailed on or after January 1, 2011.

(f) Collection cost recovery fee revenues shall be deposited in the same manner as revenues derived from any other surcharge imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 41.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

40169.
